West Virginia, session 2026, HB5522.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 15. CONSUMERS SALES AND SERVICE TAX. §11-15-9v. Tax Holiday for feminine hygiene products and diapers. (a) There is established an annual sales tax holiday on the sale of feminine hygiene products and diapers. Feminine hygiene products and diapers sold on the second Saturday of May and Friday directly preceding and Sunday directly following the second Saturday of each May are exempt from taxes imposed by §11-15-1 et seq. of this code. (b) For the purposes of this section, "feminine hygiene product" means personal care products that are primarily designed for use in connection with menstruation or post-menstrual care, including but not limited to tampons, sanitary napkins, panty liners, menstrual cups, menstrual sponges, and similar absorbent or collection products, whether disposable or reusable.